Rhode Island, session 2025, SB571.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-11-18.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-11 entitled
"Suspension or Revocation of Licenses — Violations" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-11-18.1. Driving after denial, revocation, or suspension for certain violations.
(a) Any person who drives a motor vehicle on any highway of this state who never applied
for a license or who drives after his or her application for a license has been refused, or after his or
her license has expired or who otherwise drives without a license or at a time when his or her license
to operate is suspended, revoked, or cancelled, for: (1) operating under the influence of a narcotic
drug controlled substance or intoxicating liquor; (2) refusing refusal to submit to a chemical test;
(3) reckless driving; (3) manslaughter from the operation of a motor vehicle or (4) operating a
motor vehicle so as to endanger resulting in death; or (4) (5) three (3) moving violations within a
one-year period; (6) having been designated a frequent offender pursuant to § 31-27-24; or (7)
violation of the terms of a conditional hardship order issued pursuant to chapter 27 of title 31; shall
be guilty of a misdemeanor for the first and second offenses and shall be deemed guilty of a felony
for the third or subsequent offenses.
(b) The division of motor vehicles upon receiving a record of the conviction of any person
upon a charge of driving a motor vehicle while the license of the person was suspended, for reasons
set forth in this section shall suspend the person’s license or deny the person’s application for any
length of time that it shall deem proper but in no case less than an additional three (3) months. Upon

receiving a record of conviction of a second violation of driving a motor vehicle while the license
of that person was suspended for reasons set forth in this section, the division of motor vehicles
shall suspend the person’s license or deny the person’s application for any length of time that it
shall deem proper but in no case less than an additional six (6) months. Any subsequent conviction
shall result in license revocation. Upon receiving a record of the conviction of any person upon a
charge of driving after his or her application for a license had been refused, or after his or her license
had been revoked or cancelled for reasons set forth in this section, the division of motor vehicles
shall not issue a new license for an additional period of one year from and after the date the person
would otherwise have been entitled to apply for a new license.
(c)(1) Upon a first conviction under this section a mandatory fine of five hundred dollars
($500) shall be imposed, and if the person was driving after his or her application for a license had
been refused, or at a time when his or her license to operate was suspended, revoked, or cancelled
for :(i) operating under the influence of a controlled substance or intoxicating liquor, or his or her
; (ii) refusal to submit to a chemical test, ; (iii) reckless driving, manslaughter from the operation
of a motor vehicle, or operation ;(iv) operating a motor vehicle so as to endanger, death resulting,
in death; (v) three (3) moving violations within a one-year period; (vi) having been designated a
frequent offender pursuant to § 31-27-24; or (vii) violation of the terms of a conditional hardship
order issued pursuant to chapter 27 of title 31 the person shall be imprisoned for a minimum of ten
(10) days.
(2) A mandatory fine of five hundred dollars ($500) for a second conviction under this
section within a five (5) year period shall be imposed, and if the person was driving after his or her
application for a license had been refused, or at a time when his or her license to operate was
suspended, revoked, or cancelled for :(i) operating under the influence of a controlled substance or
intoxicating liquor or his or her ; (ii) refusal to submit to a chemical test, ; (iii) reckless driving,
manslaughter from the operation of a motor vehicle, or operation ; (iv) operating a motor vehicle
so as to endanger, death resulting in death; (v) three (3) moving violations within a one-year period;
(vi) having been designated a frequent offender pursuant to § 31-27-24; or (vii) violation of the
terms of a conditional hardship order issued pursuant to chapter 27 of title 31 the person shall be
imprisoned for a minimum of six (6) months to one year.
(3) For any subsequent conviction within a five (5) year period, a fine of one thousand
dollars ($1,000) shall be imposed and the person may be imprisoned for up to one year or be
required to participate in a public service program designated and approved by the court. If the
person was driving after his or her application for a license had been refused or at a time when his
or her license to operate was suspended, revoked, or cancelled for: (i) operating under the influence
LC001657 - Page 2 of 4

of a controlled substance or intoxicating liquor; (ii) his or her refusal to submit to a chemical test;
(iii) reckless driving; (iv) manslaughter from the operation of a motor vehicle; or (v) operating a
motor vehicle so as to endanger, death resulting in death; (v) three (3) moving violations within a
one-year period; (vi) having been designated a frequent offender pursuant to § 31-27-24; or (vii)
violation of the terms of a conditional hardship order issued pursuant to chapter 27 of title 31 the
person shall be imprisoned for a minimum of one year. Jurisdiction for violations of this section is
given to the district court and the court shall have full authority to impose any sentence authorized
for violations of this section.
(d) No fines, suspensions, treatment, or jail provided for under this section can be
suspended.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001657
========
LC001657 - Page 3 of 4